Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.300

Application—RCW 7.105.305 through 7.105.325.

RCW 7.105.305 through 7.105.325 apply to all orders other than extreme risk protection orders.

[ 2021 c 215 s 37.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.